Maryland, session 2026, SB0152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0152*

SENATE BILL 152
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) through (g) of this section, the clerks of
the District Court shall:
(1) Collect costs, fines, forfeitures, or penalties imposed by the court; and
(2) Remit them to the State under a system agreed upon by the Chief Judge
of the District Court and the Comptroller.
(e) (1) (i) A citation issued under § 21–202.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–707.1, §
21–809, § 21–809.1, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation
Article shall provide that the person receiving the citation may elect to stand trial by
notifying the issuing agency of the person’s intention to stand trial at least 5 days before
the date of payment as set forth in the citation.
(ii) On receipt of the notice to stand trial, the agency shall forward
to the District Court having venue a copy of the citation and a copy of the notice from the
person who received the citation indicating the person’s intention to stand trial.
(iii) On receipt thereof, the District Court shall schedule the case for
trial and notify the defendant of the trial date under procedures adopted by the Chief Judge
of the District Court.
(2) (i) A citation issued as the result of any of the following systems or
cameras controlled by a political subdivision shall provide that, in an uncontested case, the
penalty shall be paid directly to that political subdivision:
1. A vehicle height monitoring system;
2. A traffic control signal monitoring system;
3. A speed monitoring system;
4. A POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM;
5. A work zone speed control system;
[5.] 6. A stop sign monitoring system;
[6.] 7. A school bus monitoring camera;
[7.] 8. A bus lane monitoring system; or

SENATE BILL 152 3
[8.] 9. A noise abatement monitoring system.
(ii) A citation issued as the result of any of the following systems or
cameras controlled by a political subdivision shall provide that, in a contested case, the
penalty shall be paid directly to the District Court:
1. A vehicle height monitoring system;
2. A traffic control signal monitoring system;
3. A speed monitoring system;
4. A POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM;
5. A work zone speed control system;
[5.] 6. A stop sign monitoring system;
[6.] 7. A school bus monitoring camera;
[7.] 8. A bus lane monitoring system; or
[8.] 9. A noise abatement monitoring system.
(iii) A citation issued as the result of any of the following systems or
cameras controlled by a State agency shall provide that, in an uncontested or contested
case, the penalty shall be paid directly to the District Court:
1. A traffic control signal monitoring system;
2. A work zone speed control system;
3. A speed monitoring system; or
4. A bus lane monitoring system.
(3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this
paragraph and paragraph (6) of this subsection, civil penalties resulting from citations
issued using a vehicle height monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system,
speed monitoring system, POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM, work zone
speed control system, stop sign monitoring system, school bus monitoring camera, bus lane
monitoring system, or a noise abatement monitoring system that are collected by the
District Court shall be collected in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and
distributed in accordance with § 12–118 of the Transportation Article.

SENATE BILL 152
(4) (i) Except as provided in paragraphs (5) and (6) of this subsection,
from the fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed
monitoring systems, POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS, work zone speed
control systems, stop sign monitoring systems, school bus monitoring cameras, bus lane
monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring systems, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS, work
zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring systems, school bus monitoring cameras,
bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes, including
pedestrian or highway safety programs.
(ii) 1. For any fiscal year, if the balance remaining from the fines
collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed monitoring
systems OR POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS, after the costs of
implementing and administering the systems are recovered in accordance with
subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph, is greater than 10% of the total revenues of the
political subdivision for the fiscal year, the political subdivision shall remit any funds that
exceed 10% of the total revenues to the Comptroller.
2. The Comptroller shall deposit any money remitted under
this subparagraph to the General Fund of the State.
(iii) The fines collected by Prince George’s County as a result of
violations enforced by speed monitoring systems OR POINT–TO–POINT SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEMS on Maryland Route 210 shall be remitted to the Comptroller for
distribution to the State Highway Administration to be used solely to assist in covering the
costs of:
1. Examining the engineering, infrastructure, and other
relevant factors that may contribute to safety issues on Maryland Route 210 in Prince
George’s County;
2. Reporting its findings and recommendations on any
solutions to these safety issues; and
3. Implementing any solutions to these safety issues.
Article – Transportation
21–809.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.

SENATE BILL 152 5
(B) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “MONITORED SEGMENT OF HIGHWAY” MEANS A SEGMENT OF
HIGHWAY THAT IS MONITORED BY A POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM.
(3) “POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM” MEANS A
DEVICE THAT USES AT LEAST TWO MOTOR VEHICLE SENSORS TO CALCULATE THE
AVERAGE SPEED OF A MOTOR VEHICLE BETWEEN TWO GEOGRAPHICALLY FIXED
POINTS.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY MAY PLACE AND USE POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS ON
MARYLAND ROUTE 210 (INDIAN HEAD HIGHWAY) ONLY IF:
(1) EACH MONITORED SEGMENT OF HIGHWAY IS AT LEAST 1 MILE
AND NOT MORE THAN 10 MILES IN LENGTH;
(2) SIGNAGE INDICATING THAT A POINT–TO–POINT SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM IS IN USE IS:
(I) INSTALLED BEFORE THE MONITORED SEGMENT OF
HIGHWAY; AND
(II) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MANUAL AND SPECIFICATIONS
FOR A UNIFORM SYSTEM OF TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICES ADOPTED BY THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 25–104 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) EACH MONITORED SEGMENT OF HIGHWAY INCLUDES AT LEAST
ONE DEVICE THAT DISPLAYS A REAL–TIME POSTING OF THE SPEED AT WHICH A
DRIVER IS TRAVELING; AND
(4) THE COUNTY AND THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION
PUBLISH NOTICE OF THE LOCATION OF THE POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEM AND THE MONITORED SEGMENT OF HIGHWAY ON THEIR WEBSITES AT LEAST
30 DAYS BEFORE ACTIVATING THE POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM.
(D) A POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM MAY BE PLACED AND
USED ONLY AT A LOCATION THAT IS IDENTIFIED BY SAFETY STUDIES AS HIGH RISK
FOR MOTOR VEHICLE CRASHES OR AS HAVING A HIGH PREVALENCE FOR SPEEDING.

SENATE BILL 152
(E) THE PROVISIONS OF § 21–809(B)(1)(I)1, (II), (X), AND (XI), (2) THROUGH
(6), AND (C) THROUGH (J) OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT APPLY TO SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEMS SHALL APPLY TO POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER
THIS SECTION.
(F) (1) A POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM MAY BE USED
ONLY TO:
(I) IDENTIFY SPEED VIOLATIONS BY MOTOR VEHICLES
TRAVELING AT AN AVERAGE SPEED OF AT LEAST 12 MILES PER HOUR ABOVE THE
POSTED SPEED LIMIT IN A MONITORED SEGMENT OF HIGHWAY;
(II) GENERATE CITATIONS; AND
(III) RESPOND TO APPEALS.
(2) A POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM MAY NOT BE
USED FOR:
(I) GENERAL SURVEILLANCE;
(II) IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT; OR
(III) CRIMINAL INVESTIGATIONS OR LAW ENFORCEMENT
PURPOSES UNRELATED TO SPEEDING VIOLATIONS.
(G) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31, 2028, AND EACH JANUARY 31
THEREAFTER, PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY SHALL, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON
THE POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS OPERATED UNDER THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING:
(1) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF CITATIONS ISSUED FOR EACH
MONITORED SEGMENT OF HIGHWAY;
(2) THE GROSS REVENUE GENERATED;
(3) THE EXPENDITURES INCURRED;
(4) THE NET REVENUE GENERATED;
(5) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF ANY PAYMENTS MADE TO A CONTRACTOR
UNDER THE PROGRAM;

SENATE BILL 152 7
(6) A DESCRIPTION OF HOW THE NET REVENUE GENERATED FROM
THE POINT–TO–POINT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS WAS USED, INCLUDING WHAT
PERCENTAGE OF NET REVENUE WAS DEDICATED TO ROADWAY SAFETY
IMPROVEMENTS ON OR NEAR MARYLAND ROUTE 210 (INDIAN HEAD HIGHWAY);
(7) CHANGES TO THE AVERAGE SPEED ON EACH MONITORED
SEGMENT OF HIGHWAY; AND
(8) FOR EACH MONITORED SEGMENT OF HIGHWAY, CHANGES IN THE
NUMBER OF MOTOR VEHICLE CRASHES AND MOTOR VEHICLE CRASHES THAT
RESULT IN SERIOUS BODILY INJURY OR DEATH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.